tests/mz.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../tyv.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../tyv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] regular vowel harmony when no cluster":
    роль<n><nom> : роль
    роль<n><attr> : роль
    роль<n><acc> : рольду
    медаль<n><nom> : медаль
    медаль<n><attr> : медаль
    медаль<n><gen> : медальдың
    медаль<n><dat> : медальга
    медаль<n><acc> : медальды
    медаль<n><abl> : медальдан
    медаль<n><pl><nom> : медальдар

 "[twol] ending in -арь":
    секретарь<n><px3sp><nom> : секретары
    календарь<n><px3sp><nom> : календары 
    секретарь<n><loc> : секретарьда
    календарь<n><loc> : календарьда
    секретарь<n><px3sp><loc> : секретарында
    календарь<n><px3sp><loc> : календарында

 "[twol] ending in -ирь": 
    Сибирь<np><top><gen> : Сибирьниң

 "[twol] front vowel harmony when intervening Cль":
    рубль<n><nom> : рубль
    рубль<n><attr> : рубль
    рубль<n><gen> : рубльдиң
    рубль<n><dat> : рубльге
    рубль<n><acc> : рубльди
    рубль<n><abl> : рубльден
    рубль<n><pl><nom> : рубльдер
    ансамбль<n><pl><nom> : ансамбльдер

 "[twol] front harmony, but for which reason(s)?":
    кремль<n><dat> : кремльге
    кремль<n><all> : кремльче
    кремль<n><loc> : кремльде

 "[twol] regular vowel harmony when any other CCь intervenes (also: cluster simplification)":
    область<n><nom> : область
    область<n><attr> : область
    область<n><gen> : областың
    область<n><dat> : обласка
    область<n><abl> : областан
    область<n><all> : обласче
    область<n><loc> : областа
    область<n><acc> : областы
    область<n><pl><nom> : областар
    область<n><pl><abl> : областардан
    область<n><px3sp><gen> : облазының
    область<n><px3sp><loc> : облазында
    область<n><px3sp><dat> : облазынга
    область<n><px3sp><all> : облазынче
    область<n><px3sp><abl> : облазындан

 "[twol] ь deletes before surface vowel":
    рубль<n><px3sp><nom> : рубли
    рубль<n><px3sp><acc> : рублин
    ансамбль<n><px3sp><gen> : ансамблиниң
    кремль<n><px3sp><nom> : кремли

 "[twol] ь should not delete before when there's no morpheme boundary":
    Афанасьев<np><cog><f><gen> : Афанасьеваның
